New Mexico, session 2026, SB46.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--One hundred thirty thousand dollars ($130,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the department of environment for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 to explore pollution reduction and cost-saving opportunities resulting from the diversion of organic waste from the solid waste stream and to conduct a waste characterization study to assess the current types and quantities of solid waste, organic waste and composting feed stock produced and disposed of in the state. The department of environment shall submit a report detailing the department's findings to the appropriate legislative interim committee dealing with the environment before June 30, 2027. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. - 2 -